Connecticut, session 2026, HB05380.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 46a-13m of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes concerning
the confidentiality of records and information, the Child Advocate may
request and shall have access to, including the right to promptly inspect
and copy, any records necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the
Child Advocate as provided in section 46a-13l. Such records shall be
provided to the Child Advocate not later than fourteen days from the
date of such request. If the Child Advocate is denied access to any
records necessary to carry out said responsibilities, the Child Advocate
may issue a subpoena for the production of such records as provided in
subsection (c) of this section.
(b) In the performance of [his] the Child Advocate's responsibilities
under subsection (a) of section 46a-13l the Child Advocate may
communicate privately with any child or person who has received, is
LCO No. 1891 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5380
receiving or should have received services from the state. Such
communications shall be confidential and not be subject to disclosure
except as provided in subsection (a) of section 46a-13n.
(c) The Child Advocate may issue subpoenas to compel the
attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of books,
papers and other documents and to administer oaths to witnesses in any
matter under [his] the Child Advocate's investigation. If any person to
whom such subpoena is issued fails to appear or, having appeared,
refuses to give testimony or fails to produce the evidence required, the
Child Advocate may apply to the superior court for the judicial district
of Hartford which shall have jurisdiction to order such person to appear
and give testimony or to produce such evidence, as the case may be.
(d) The Child Advocate may apply for and accept grants, gifts and
bequests of funds from other states, federal and interstate agencies and
independent authorities and private firms, individuals and foundations,
for the purpose of carrying out [his] the Child Advocate's
responsibilities. There is established a child advocate account, which
shall be a separate, nonlapsing account. Any funds received under this
subsection shall, upon deposit in the General Fund, be credited to said
account and may be used by the Child Advocate in the performance of
[his] the Child Advocate's duties.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 46a-13m